Utah statutes.
77-2-8.   Violation of diversion agreement -- Hearing -- Prosecution resumed.

If, during the course of the diversion of a defendant, information is brought to the attention of a magistrate or the prosecuting attorney that the defendant has violated his diversion agreement and it appears in the best interests of the community to reinstate and proceed with the prosecution, the prosecuting attorney, upon court approval, or the magistrate, on his own motion, shall cause to be served upon the defendant an order to show cause specifying the facts relied upon by the prosecuting attorney or magistrate to terminate diversion and shall set a time and place for a hearing to determine whether or not the defendant has violated his diversion agreement. If, at the hearing, the magistrate finds the defendant has failed to comply with any terms or conditions of the diversion agreement, he may authorize the prosecuting attorney to proceed with prosecution.  The prosecution of a diverted offense shall not bar any independent prosecution arising from any offense that constituted a violation of any term or condition of the diversion agreement by which the original prosecution was diverted.

